Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-217 Charter, bylaw provisions.
No policy shall contain any provision purporting to make any portion of the
charter, bylaws or other constituent document of the insurer a part of the
contract unless that portion is set forth in full in the policy. Any policy
provision in violation of this section shall be invalid. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next